District of Columbia statutes.
24-706

When hearing is required.

If, in a report filed pursuant to § 24-705, either of the examining physicians states that the patient is a drug user, or that he is unable to reach any conclusion by reason of the refusal of the patient to submit to thorough examination, the Court shall conduct a hearing upon petition of the United States Attorney in the manner provided in § 24-707.

History

June 24, 1953, 67 Stat. 78, ch. 149, § 6
July 24, 1956, 70 Stat. 610, ch. 676, title I, § 101

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 24-606.
1973 Ed., § 24-606.